Illinois, session 104th, SB135.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 211 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/211)7    Sec. 211. Economic Development for a Growing Economy Tax 8Credit. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 1999, a 9Taxpayer who has entered into an Agreement (including a New 10Construction EDGE Agreement) under the Economic Development 11for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act is entitled to a credit 12against the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of 13Section 201 of this Act in an amount to be determined in the 14Agreement. If the Taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S 15corporation, the credit shall be allowed to the partners or 16shareholders in accordance with the determination of income 17and distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 18and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. The Department, 19in cooperation with the Department of Commerce and Economic 20Opportunity, shall prescribe rules to enforce and administer 21the provisions of this Section. This Section is exempt from 22the provisions of Section 250 of this Act.23    The credit shall be subject to the conditions set forth in   SB0135- 2 -LRB104 03839 HLH 13863 b1the Agreement and the following limitations:2        (1) The tax credit shall not exceed the Incremental 3    Income Tax (as defined in Section 5-5 of the Economic 4    Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit Act) with 5    respect to the project; additionally, the New Construction 6    EDGE Credit shall not exceed the New Construction EDGE 7    Incremental Income Tax (as defined in Section 5-5 of the 8    Economic Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit 9    Act).10        (2) The amount of the credit allowed during the tax 11    year plus the sum of all amounts allowed in prior years 12    shall not exceed 100% of the aggregate amount expended by 13    the Taxpayer during all prior tax years on approved costs 14    defined by Agreement.15        (3) The amount of the credit shall be determined on an 16    annual basis. Except as applied in a carryover year 17    pursuant to Section 211(4) of this Act, the credit may not 18    be applied against any State income tax liability in more 19    than 10 taxable years; provided, however, that (i) an 20    eligible business certified by the Department of Commerce 21    and Economic Opportunity under the Corporate Headquarters 22    Relocation Act may not apply the credit against any of its 23    State income tax liability in more than 15 taxable years 24    and (ii) credits allowed to that eligible business are 25    subject to the conditions and requirements set forth in 26    Sections 5-35 and 5-45 of the Economic Development for a   SB0135- 3 -LRB104 03839 HLH 13863 b1    Growing Economy Tax Credit Act and Section 5-51 as 2    applicable to New Construction EDGE Credits.3        (4) The credit may not exceed the amount of taxes 4    imposed pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 5    of this Act. Any credit that is unused in the year the 6    credit is computed may be carried forward and applied to 7    the tax liability of the 10 5 taxable years following the 8    excess credit year, except as otherwise provided under 9    paragraph (4.5) of this Section. It is the intent of the 10    General Assembly that the carry forward period for all 11    credits that have not expired as of the effective date of 12    this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall be 13    extended to 10 years. The credit shall be applied to the 14    earliest year for which there is a tax liability. If there 15    are credits from more than one tax year that are available 16    to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be applied 17    first.18        (4.5) The Department of Commerce and Economic 19    Opportunity, in consultation with the Department of 20    Revenue, shall adopt rules to extend the sunset of any 21    earned, existing, or unused credit as provided for in 22    Section 605-1055 of the Department of Commerce and 23    Economic Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code 24    of Illinois. 25        (5) No credit shall be allowed with respect to any 26    Agreement for any taxable year ending after the   SB0135- 4 -LRB104 03839 HLH 13863 b1    Noncompliance Date. Upon receiving notification by the 2    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity of the 3    noncompliance of a Taxpayer with an Agreement, the 4    Department shall notify the Taxpayer that no credit is 5    allowed with respect to that Agreement for any taxable 6    year ending after the Noncompliance Date, as stated in 7    such notification. If any credit has been allowed with 8    respect to an Agreement for a taxable year ending after 9    the Noncompliance Date for that Agreement, any refund paid 10    to the Taxpayer for that taxable year shall, to the extent 11    of that credit allowed, be an erroneous refund within the 12    meaning of Section 912 of this Act.13        If, during any taxable year, a taxpayer ceases 14    operations at a project location that is the subject of 15    that Agreement with the intent to terminate operations in 16    the State, the tax imposed under subsections (a) and (b) 17    of Section 201 of this Act for such taxable year shall be 18    increased by the amount of any credit allowed under the 19    Agreement for that project location prior to the date the 20    taxpayer ceases operations.21        (6) For purposes of this Section, the terms 22    "Agreement", "Incremental Income Tax", "New Construction 23    EDGE Agreement", "New Construction EDGE Credit", "New 24    Construction EDGE Incremental Income Tax", and 25    "Noncompliance Date" have the same meaning as when used in 26    the Economic Development for a Growing Economy Tax Credit   SB0135- 5 -LRB104 03839 HLH 13863 b1    Act.2(Source: P.A. 101-9, eff. 6-5-19; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 3102-40, eff. 6-25-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21.) 4    Section 10. The Economic Development for a Growing Economy 5Tax Credit Act is amended by changing Section 5-45 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 10/5-45)7    Sec. 5-45. Amount and duration of the credit. 8    (a) The Department shall determine the amount and duration 9of the credit awarded under this Act. The duration of the 10credit may not exceed 10 taxable years for projects qualified 11under paragraph (1), (1.5), or (1.6) of subsection (b) of 12Section 5-20 or 15 taxable years for projects qualified under 13paragraph (1.7) of subsection (b) of Section 5-20. The credit 14may be stated as a percentage of the Incremental Income Tax 15attributable to the applicant's project and may include a 16fixed dollar limitation.17    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), and except as the 18credit may be applied in a carryover year pursuant to Section 19211(4) of the Illinois Income Tax Act, the credit may be 20applied against the State income tax liability in more than 10 21taxable years but not in more than 15 taxable years for an 22eligible business that (i) qualifies under this Act and the 23Corporate Headquarters Relocation Act and has in fact 24undertaken a qualifying project within the time frame   SB0135- 6 -LRB104 03839 HLH 13863 b1specified by the Department of Commerce and Economic 2Opportunity under that Act, and (ii) applies against its State 3income tax liability, during the entire 15-year period, no 4more than 60% of the maximum credit per year that would 5otherwise be available under this Act.6    (b-5) Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b), a recipient 7of a credit may request a certificate of transferability of 8credit from the Department for the amount of credit not 9previously claimed. A transferability certificate so issued 10may be transferred or sold by the recipient to another 11Illinois taxpayer. Transferors and sellers shall submit to the 12Department of Revenue a notification of any transfer or sale 13of tax credits within 30 days after the transfer or sale of 14those tax credits. The notification, which shall be in the 15form prescribed by the Department, shall include the 16transferor's tax credit balance prior to transfer, the credit 17certificate number, the identifying number of the EDGE 18agreement, the transferor's remaining tax credit balance after 19transfer, all tax identification numbers for both transferor 20and transferee, the date of transfer, the amount transferred, 21a copy of the credit certificate, and any other information 22required by the Department of Revenue. The transfer or sale of 23the credit does not extend the time in which the credit can be 24used. The carry forward period for a credit that is 25transferred or sold begins on the date on which the credit was 26originally granted by the Department. To the extent the   SB0135- 7 -LRB104 03839 HLH 13863 b1transferor did not have rights to claim or use the credit at 2the time of the transfer or sale, the Department of Revenue 3shall either disallow the credit claimed by the transferee or 4recapture the credit from the transferee through any 5collection method authorized by statute. In such case, the 6transferee's recourse is against the transferor. 7    (c) Nothing in this Section shall prevent the Department, 8in consultation with the Department of Revenue, from adopting 9rules to extend the sunset of any earned, existing, and unused 10tax credit or credits a taxpayer may be in possession of, as 11provided for in Section 605-1070 of the Department of Commerce 12and Economic Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code 13of Illinois, notwithstanding the carry-forward provisions 14pursuant to paragraph (4) of Section 211 of the Illinois 15Income Tax Act. 16(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 17103-595, eff. 6-26-24.)